Utah statutes.
76-6-510.   Bribe receiving by a labor official.

(1) Any labor official who solicits, accepts, or agrees to accept any benefit from another person upon an agreement or understanding that the benefit will influence him in any of his acts, decisions, or duties as a labor official is guilty of bribe receiving by a labor official.

(2)  Bribe receiving by a labor official is a felony of the third degree.

